Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2113XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 351 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 904.103A Mental health support for 1 corrections officers. 2 1. The department shall hire a mental health liaison staff 3 member for each institution under its jurisdiction. One mental 4 health liaison staff member may cover multiple institutions. 5 The mental health liaison staff member shall be responsible for 6 all of the following: 7 a. Coordinating efforts between the correctional facility 8 and mental health providers in the local region to help 9 corrections officers. 10 b. Coordinating with department leadership to ensure that 11 the program is operating in accordance with this section. 12 c. Overseeing and coordinating the activities of the 13 outreach team. 14 2. The department shall do all of the following: 15 a. Develop and administer a brief annual mental health 16 screening survey composed of five to ten questions that seek 17 to identify severe mental illnesses, including schizophrenia, 18 bipolar disorder, and major depression. The survey shall 19 ask corrections officers about the symptoms of severe mental 20 illness they may be experiencing or have experienced and any 21 prior use of mental health-related medications or inpatient 22 care. The survey shall identify the individualâs place of 23 residence, and be administered by a trained staff member at the 24 correctional facility to all corrections officers. 25 b. Develop any technology necessary for a correctional 26 facility to provide the annual mental health screening survey. 27 c. Hire staff necessary for a correctional facility to 28 provide the annual mental health screening survey. 29 d. Establish an outreach team to refer a corrections officer 30 whose responses to the survey indicate severe mental illness 31 to a local mental health care provider for further assessment 32 and outreach, admission if necessary, and support for the 33 officer in reestablishing ties with a mental health provider. 34 An established outreach team shall be composed of mental 35 -1- LSB 2113XS (3) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 351 health care professionals or clinicians from mental health 1 care centers local to the correctional facility, staff from 2 the correctional facility when applicable, and a mental health 3 liaison staff member who shall oversee the outreach team. If a 4 correctional officer has been determined to need a referral to 5 a mental health care provider, the department shall immediately 6 notify the outreach team. 7 e. Provide reasonable reimbursement for costs incurred by 8 professionals of the outreach team. 9 f. Provide at least one mandatory, employer-funded, paid 10 confidential counseling session annually for each staff 11 member with a licensed mental health professional to ensure 12 corrections officers have access to the support they need to 13 reduce officer turnover, improve productivity, and foster a 14 healthier work environment. 15 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ MENTAL HEALTH LIAISONS 16 ââ APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the general fund 17 of the state to the department of corrections for the fiscal 18 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 19 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 20 used for the purposes designated: 21 For the hiring of a mental health liaison for each 22 institution under the jurisdiction of the department, including 23 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 25